Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 10 Water and Sewer District Law
§ 41-10-113.
Powers of district board.

For and on behalf of the district the board of any district shall have the following powers:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions and proceedings;

In the case of a sewer district or water and sewer district, to prepare or cause to be prepared and to revise and adopt plans, designs, and estimates of costs, of a system or systems of outfall sewers, trunks, mains, submains, interceptors, lateral sewers, outlets for sewerage, storm water drains, pumping and ventilating stations, disposal and treatment plants and works, and any and all other structures, systems, works, and things, which, in the judgment of the board, will provide an effective and advantageous means for insuring the area within such district of adequate sanitary disposal and treatment of the sewage thereof, or such section or parts of such system or systems as the board may from time to time deem proper or convenient to construct, consistent with the purposes of this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

], and to take any and all such steps as the board may deem proper and necessary to effect the purposes hereof;

In the case of a sewer district or water and sewer district, to establish, own, construct, improve, lease, operate, and maintain, as part of the sewer and drainage system or systems of the district, sewage treatment and disposal plants and systems and all appurtenances and appliances thereunto belonging, and to sell any product or by-product manufactured in the course of sewage treatment;

In the case of a sewer district or water and sewer district, to enter into and perform contracts, whether long-term or short-term, with any establishment, whether within or without the district, for the provision and operation by the district of sewerage facilities to abate or reduce the pollution of waters caused by discharges of wastes by such establishment, and the payment periodically by such establishment of the district of amounts at least sufficient to compensate the district for the cost of providing (including payment of principal and interest charges, if any) and operating and maintaining the sewerage facilities serving such establishment;

In the case of a sewer district or water and sewer district, to acquire an appropriate outlet within or without the district and to extend its sewer lines thereto;

In the case of a water district or water and sewer district, to prepare or cause to be prepared and to revise and adopt plans, designs, and estimates of costs, of a system or systems of raw and clear water and distribution storage reservoirs, deep and shallow wells, pumping and gauging stations, tunnels, flumes, conduits, canals, infiltration galleries, hydrants, meters, filtration and treatment plants and works, and any and all other structures, systems, works and things which, in the judgment of the board, will provide an effective and advantageous means for insuring the territory within such district of an adequate supply of domestic water, or such sections or parts of such system or systems as the board may from time to time deem proper or convenient to construct, consistent with the purposes of this act, and to take any and all such steps as the board may deem proper and necessary to effect the purposes hereof consistent with the appropriation laws and the uses prescribed by statute;

In the case of a water district or water and sewer district, to establish, own, construct, improve, lease, operate and maintain, as part of the water system or systems of the district, water treatment plants and systems and all appurtenances and appliances thereunto belonging;

In the case of a water district or water and sewer district, to appropriate and otherwise acquire sources of supply of water within and without the district and to extend its water lines thereto;

Except as otherwise provided in this act, to enter into contracts and agreements affecting the affairs of the district, including but not limited to contracts with the United States of America and any of its agencies or instrumentalities, and contracts with any municipality or district for the operation of a common or jointly owned project. Any improvement or improvements of any nature made in any district where the entire cost, value or amount of such work including labor and materials shall exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), except such work done by employees of the district with supplies and materials purchased by it as hereinafter provided or except by labor or supplies and materials, or all of such, supplied under agreement with the United States of America, the state of Wyoming, or any federal or state agency, instrumentality or corporation, or other political subdivision, shall be done only under independent contract to be entered into by the district with the lowest responsible bidder submitting the lowest and best bid upon proper terms after due public notice by publication has been given asking for competitive bids. The district shall have the right to reject any and all bids and to waive any irregularity in any bid. Any contract may be let on a lump sum or unit basis. No contract shall be entered into for such work unless the contractor shall give an undertaking with a sufficient surety or sureties approved by the board and in an amount fixed by the board for the faithful performance of the contract. Upon default in the performance of any contract, the proper official may advertise and relet the remainder of the work without further resolution and deduct the cost from the original contract price and recover any excess cost by suit on the original bond, or otherwise. The district shall have the power to make any improvement, or portion thereof, in any district, directly by the officers, agents and employees of the district, with supplies and materials purchased or otherwise acquired therefor. All supplies, materials, equipment, machinery and apparatus purchased by the board for any district (but not by a contractor) costing thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) or more shall be purchased only after notice by publication for competitive bids. The district shall accept the lowest bid, kind, quality and material being equal, but the district shall have the right to reject any and all bids, to waive any irregularity in any bid, and to select a single item from any bid. The provision as to bidding shall not apply to the purchase of patented and manufactured products offered for sale in a noncompetitive market or solely by a manufacturer’s authorized dealer;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness and other obligations and evidence the same by certificates, notes or debentures, and to issue bonds, in accordance with the provisions of this act;

To acquire, dispose of and encumber real and personal property, water, water rights, water and sewer works and plants, and any interest therein, including leases, easements, and revenues derived from the operation thereof. The constitutional and inherent powers of the legislature are hereby delegated to the board for the acquisition, disposal and encumbrance of property provided that the board shall in no case receive title to property already devoted to public purpose or use, except with the consent of the owners of such property, and except upon approval of a majority of the board;

To enter on any lands, waters and premises for the purposes of making surveys, soundings, examinations, tests and inspections;

To consult with the state department of health about any system or proposed system of water supply, drainage or sewage, as to the most appropriate source of water supply and the best method of assuring its purity, or as to the best method of disposing of the district’s drainage or sewage with reference to the existing and future needs of other cities, towns, districts or other persons which may be affected thereby; and to submit to the department of health for its advice and approval the district’s proposed system of water supply or of the disposal of drainage or sewage. No district shall proceed to acquire or improve any system of water supply, drainage or sewage disposal without first obtaining the approval of the state department of health. In this subsection the term “drainage” means rainfall, surface and subsoil water only, and “sewage” means domestic and industrial filth and waste;

To have the management, control and supervision of all the business and affairs of the district, and the acquisition, improvement, equipment, operation and maintenance of any district project;

To hire and retain agents, employees, servants, engineers and attorneys, and any other persons necessary or desirable to effect the purposes of this act;

To prescribe the duties of officers, agents, employees and servants, and fix their compensation provided that the compensation of district employees and officers shall be established as prevailing rates of pay for equivalent work;

To have and exercise the power of eminent domain and dominant eminent domain and in the manner provided by law for the condemnation by a city of private property for public use to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers granted, both within and without the district;

To construct and maintain works and establish and maintain facilities across or along any public street and in, upon, or over any vacant public lands which are now or may become the property of the state of Wyoming, and to construct works and establish and maintain facilities across any stream of water or watercourse. The district shall promptly restore the street to its former state of usefulness as nearly as possible, and shall not completely or unnecessarily impair its usefulness. Whenever it is necessary, in making any improvements under the provisions of this act, to enter upon or cross any property of the state acquired for and utilized in the operation and maintenance of a state highway, the district shall have the right-of-way over the same by filing a plat of the lands and of its proposed improvements with the state department of transportation and acquiring a license from the department. The license shall provide that the utility facility will be constructed in a manner to conform with applicable federal, state or local laws, codes and ordinances and as directed by the state department of transportation;

To fix and from time to time to increase or decrease water and sewer rates, tolls or charges, including but not necessarily limited to use charges, connection fees and standby charges, for services or facilities furnished by the district, and to pledge such revenue for the payment of any indebtedness of the district. Until paid, all rates, tolls or charges shall constitute a perpetual lien on and against the property served, and any such lien may be foreclosed in the same manner as provided by the laws of the state of Wyoming for the foreclosure of mechanics’ liens. Before any such lien is foreclosed the district shall hold a hearing thereon after notice thereof by publication and by registered first class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the last known owner at his last known address according to the records of the district and the real property assessment roll in the county in which the property is located. The board shall shut off or discontinue service for delinquencies in the payment of such rates, tolls or charges, or in the payment of taxes or assessments levied pursuant to this act, and prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for the connection with and the disconnection from properties of the facilities of the district. For health and sanitary purposes the board shall have the power to compel the owners of inhabited property within a sewer district to connect their property with the sewer system of such district and upon a failure so to connect within sixty (60) days after such written, mailed notice by the board so to do the board may cause such connection to be made and a lien to be filed against the property for the expense incurred in making such connection. No owner shall be compelled to connect his property with such system unless a service line is brought, by the district, to a point within four hundred (400) feet of his dwelling place;

To adopt and amend bylaws, not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state for carrying on the business, objects and affairs of the board and of the district. These bylaws shall be filed with the county clerk for each county in which the district is located;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this act. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this act;

When a district abuts a city or town and when all of its indebtedness has been fully paid or satisfied, to convey to such city or town with the consent of the governing authority thereof, all of the property of such district upon the condition that such city or town will operate and maintain such property regardless of whether the area comprising the district is annexed to the municipality. Upon such conveyance the district shall be dissolved and a certificate to such effect shall be signed by the clerical officer of the city or town and filed with the secretary of state and any county clerk and recorder of any county in which the order establishing the district is filed;

When two (2) or more districts are using the same or joint facilities and when the obligations of each district are fully paid or satisfied, to consolidate such districts into one (1). In such an event the consolidated district shall be under the control of a joint board consisting of the members of each board, until by the occurrence of vacancies or expiration of terms of office the board is reduced to five (5) members. Thereafter the members of the board shall be elected as provided in W.S.

41-10-112

;

If a boundary of a district is contiguous with the corporate boundary of a city or town, a district may contract with a city or town to supply water or to provide sanitary sewer or other services for which the district was organized to property within the city or town, if it is economically feasible in the opinion of the board. Any water service shall be accomplished in strict adherence with the water rights held by the district, or as such rights may be amended or enlarged under procedures of law provided in title 41 of the Wyoming statutes through the state engineer. The board may finance the extension and maintenance of the water or sewer system through revenue bonds or other means granted by law for financing the service. A one-time connection fee or system investment fee reasonably calculated to permit recovery of a proportionate share of the system infrastructure cost necessary to treat, deliver or transport the water or sewer may also be charged. A one-time fee may also be charged to recover reasonable expenses incurred by the district in determining the actual costs necessary to treat, deliver or transport the water or sewer to the point of connection. The district board may establish one (1) or more service areas outside the district in each of which an average rate may be used for all customers. Charges for special services such as line installation and maintenance shall be in addition to the water or sewer rate. The rate established for use of water or sewer pursuant to this section is as follows:

A district which at any time after April 1, 1999, enters into a contract to serve property within a contiguous city or town outside of its district boundaries shall establish rates, tolls and charges that are no less than the rates, tolls and charges charged for the same or similar service within the district and that do not exceed the actual costs of treating, delivering or transporting the water or sewer to the point of connection. As used in this paragraph, “actual costs” of treating, delivering or transporting water or sewerage shall include a proportionate share of the following costs related to the water or sewer system:

Fees, interest charges and principal payments on all bonds issued and other indebtedness incurred to construct, purchase or improve the system;

Salaries and wages of employees;

The cost of materials, supplies, utilities and outside services;

Other costs directly related to the water delivery or sewer system;

The cost for providing and maintaining a depreciation fund, a fund for emergencies and a fund for acquisition and development of new water rights and water sources;

Administrative and overhead expenses; and

The cost of acquiring, treating, delivering or transporting water or sewer.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.13; Laws 1975, ch. 129, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; ch. 241, § 3; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1999, ch. 151, § 1; ch. 160, § 1; 2015 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) or subparagraph (a)(xxvi)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Mandamus is not proper remedy to test validity of assessment. —

Mandamus is not the proper remedy where the issue presented is whether an assessment and levy against property in a district for water and sewer mains is valid when the property owner must bear the cost of connecting his particular property to the mains. Allendale Water & Sewer Dist. v. State ex rel. Hansuld, 919 P.2d 146,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1996).

Mechanic's lien unavailable unless landowner received services. —

Where a landowner never actually received anything in the way of permits, fees, connections or service from a water district for which he did not pay, a mechanics' lien is a remedy that the district did not have available. Thus, the court should have dismissed the complaint for failure to assert the statutory mechanics' lien requirements necessary to vest jurisdiction in the court. Robbins v. South Cheyenne Water & Sewage Dist., 792 P.2d 1380,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 41-10-114.
Authority of board to levy and collect taxes generally; maximum levy.

In addition to the other means providing revenue for such districts, the board shall have power and authority to levy and collect general (ad valorem) taxes on and against all taxable property within the district. No district shall levy a tax to exceed eight (8) mills on the dollar in any one (1) year, except for the payment of its public debt and the interest thereon.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.14.

§ 41-10-115.
Annual determination by board of amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation; fixing annual tax levy; certification of rate fixed and determined to county commissioners and clerks.

To levy and collect taxes, the board shall determine, in each year, the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy, which, when levied upon every dollar of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district, and together with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply funds for paying expenses of organization and the costs of acquiring, operating and maintaining the works and equipment of the district, and promptly to pay in full, when due, all interest on and principal of general obligation bonds and other such obligations of the district, and in the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 16 [§

41-10-116

]. The secretary of the district pursuant to resolution of the board shall on or before the fourth Monday in May of each year, certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district, or having a portion of its territory within the district, and file with the county clerk thereof, the rate so fixed with directions that at the time and in the manner required by law for levying taxes for county purposes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such board of county commissioners at the rate so fixed and determined.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.15.

§ 41-10-116.
Matters to be considered in certifying annual levies; additional levies.

The board, in certifying annual levies, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing general obligation bonds and interest on such bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. In case the moneys produced from such levies, together with other revenues of the district, are not sufficient punctually to pay the annual installments on its contracts or bonds, and interest thereon, and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and notwithstanding any limitations, such taxes shall be made and continue to be levied until the indebtedness of the district shall be fully paid.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.16.

§ 41-10-117.
Duty of county officials to levy and collect tax; monthly payment of collections to treasurer of district; taxes to constitute perpetual lien; lien to be on parity with general tax lien.

It shall be the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county to levy the taxes provided in this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

]. It shall be the duty of all officials charged with the duty of assessing property and collecting taxes to assess property and to collect such taxes at the time and in the form and manner with like interest and penalties as property is assessed and other taxes are collected and when collected to pay the same to the district ordering its levy and collection. The payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district. For any district the area of which is in more than one (1) county, the officials of each county shall perform said duties for the area and property therein. All taxes levied under this act, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same, shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other general taxes.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.17.

§ 41-10-118.
Sale of real and personal property for nonpayment of taxes.

If the taxes levied are not paid, then delinquent real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes, interest and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the state of Wyoming for selling real property for the nonpayment of general taxes. If there are not bids at said tax sale for the property so offered, said property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town and city taxes. Delinquent personal property shall be distrained and sold as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.18.

§ 41-10-119.
Authority of board to levy taxes and collect revenue for purpose of creating a reserve fund.

Whenever any indebtedness has been incurred by a district, it shall be lawful for the board to levy taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the board may determine, which may be used to meet the obligations of the district, for maintenance and operating charges and depreciation, and provide extension of and betterments to the improvements of the district.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.19.

§ 41-10-120.
Change in boundaries of districts; generally.

The boundary of any district organized under the provisions of this act may be changed in the manner prescribed in the Special District Elections Act of 1994, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair nor affect its organization, nor shall it affect, impair or discharge any contract, obligation, lien or charge on which it might be liable or chargeable had such change of boundaries not been made.

Property included within or annexed to a district shall be subject to the payment of taxes and charges, as provided in the Special District Elections Act of 1994. Real property excluded from a district shall thereafter be subject to the levy of taxes for the payment of its proportionate share of any indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of such exclusion. Personal property may be excluded from a district on such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the board of the district involved.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.20; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Removal of property from district. —

Although a board of county commissioners had authority under this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 41-10-103(b) to remove property from a water and sewer district, the lapse or sunsetting of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-29-307

left no statutory procedure available for doing so; thus, an owner's petition objecting to the inclusion of its property was properly dismissed.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).

§§ 41-10-121 through 41-10-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1959, ch. 188, §§ 21 through 23, related to the process for changing boundaries and dissolution of a district.

§ 41-10-124.
Authority of district to borrow money; types of securities permitted to evidence borrowing; exemption of securities from taxation.

A district may borrow money and issue the following securities to evidence such borrowing:

Short-term notes;

General obligation bonds and other like securities;

Revenue bonds and other like securities; and

Special assessment bonds and other like securities.

Any such securities of a district shall be exempt from taxation when owned by actual residents of the state, provided, that the owner or owners thereof shall list the same annually on their assessment schedule, as from time to time amended and supplemented.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.24; 1998, ch. 5, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions exempting bonds from property taxation, see §

39-11-105

.

§ 41-10-125.
Borrowing money without election in anticipation of collection of taxes; issuance of short-term notes.

A district, upon the affirmative vote of four (4) directors, is hereby authorized to borrow money without an election in anticipation of the collection of taxes or other revenues and to issue short-term notes to evidence the amount so borrowed. Such short-term notes shall be payable from the fund for which the money was borrowed; shall mature before the close of the fiscal year in which the money is so borrowed; and shall not be extended or funded except in compliance with section 26, “general obligation bonds” of this act [§

41-10-126

].

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.25.

§ 41-10-126.
Resolution and election prerequisite to issuance of general obligation bonds.

No bonds or other evidences of indebtedness payable in whole or in part from the proceeds of general (ad valorem) property taxes or to which the full faith and credit of a district are pledged, shall be issued, except in pursuance of a resolution, nor until the question of their issuance shall be submitted to a vote of the electors and approved by a majority of the qualified taxpaying electors voting on the question and by a majority of other qualified electors voting thereon, or, if no ballots are cast in one (1) of the ballot boxes and a majority of the ballots in the other ballot box favor the issuance of the bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, approved either by a majority of the qualified taxpaying electors voting thereon or by a majority of the other qualified electors voting thereon at an election held as provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 41-179.26; Laws 1965, ch. 144, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 41-10-127.
Maximum aggregate amount of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.

The aggregate amount of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness shall not exceed six percent (6%) of the assessed value of the taxable property within the district as shown by the last preceding general assessment; provided, however, that in determining the amount of indebtedness, there shall not be included within the computation, bonds or other evidences of indebtedness outstanding or authorized to be issued for supplying water to the district, short-term notes, special assessment securities, or securities payable solely from the net revenues of an income-producing system or other project.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.27.

Exception for supplying water. —

Proposed general obligation bond issue by a water and sewer district to fund an improvement project did not violate the indebtedness limitation because the exception for supplying water, set forth in this section and in Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 5, applied.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 41-10-128.
Borrowing money and issuing bonds for purpose of acquiring or improving water or sewer system or other income-producing project.

A district in pursuance of a resolution may borrow money, issue bonds, or otherwise extend its credit for the purpose of acquiring or improving a water or sewer system, or other income-producing project; provided that the bonds or other obligations shall be made payable solely out of the net revenues derived from the operation of the system or other such project; and the systems and projects may be combined, operated and maintained as joint systems or projects, in which case the bonds or other obligations shall be made payable solely out of the net revenues derived from the operation of the joint systems or projects. No revenue bonds or other like securities shall be issued unless the issuance thereof has been submitted to a vote of the electors and approved by a majority of the qualified taxpaying electors voting on the question and by a majority of other qualified electors voting thereon, or, if no ballots are cast in one (1) of the ballot boxes and a majority of the ballots in the other ballot box favor the issuance of such bonds or other like securities, approved either by a majority of the qualified taxpaying electors voting thereon or by a majority of the other qualified electors voting thereon, as the case may be, at an election held as provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.28; Laws 1965, ch. 144, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Revenue bonds not required. —

Because this section does not require a water and sewer district to issue revenue bonds, the issuance of general obligation bonds to fund a revenue-producing improvement project was lawful.
Mt. Cement Co. v. S. of Laramie Water & Sewer Dist., 2011 WY 81, 255 P.3d 881,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 41-10-129.
Power to create local improvement districts vested in board.

The power to create local improvement districts in a district organized pursuant to this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

], to assess the cost of the construction of public improvements of a local and municipal character or a part thereof against benefited property therein, and to issue special assessment bonds is vested in the board, and the districts shall be created, local improvements acquired, special assessments levied and collected and special assessment bonds issued, as provided in W.S.

15-6-101

through

15-6-448

, except as herein otherwise provided.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.29; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1.

§ 41-10-130.
Submission of question of creating indebtedness to voters upon determination by resolution that interest of district and public interest or necessity demand the acquisition or improvement of projects, making of contracts.

Whenever any board shall determine, by resolution, that the interest of said district and the public interest or necessity demand the acquisition or improvement of any project, or the making of any contract with the United States or other persons, to carry out the objects or purposes of said district, requiring the creation of an indebtedness or the issuance of securities herein required to be authorized by the electors of the district, said board shall order the submission of the proposition of creating such indebtedness or securities to the qualified electors of the district at an election. Any such election shall be held as provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

and may be held separately or may be consolidated or held concurrently with any other election authorized by this act. The declaration of public interest or necessity required and the provision for the holding of the election may be included within one (1) and the same resolution, which resolution, in addition to the declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred or the bonds are proposed to be issued, the estimated cost of the project, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred or of the bonds to be issued therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness or bonds. The resolution shall also recite the date upon which the election shall be held and the manner of holding the same and the method of voting for or against the incurring of the proposed indebtedness or bonds. The board shall direct the publication of the notice of election, the first publication of said notice to be not less than twenty (20) days prior to the election.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.30; Laws 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 41-10-131.
Principal and interest to be paid solely from net revenues; pledging surplus and unpledged revenues as additional security; bonds not issued payable from revenues or special assessments to be general obligations of district.

The principal of and interest on revenue bonds herein authorized to be issued, and any prior redemption premium or premiums, shall be payable solely from the net revenues derived from the operation of the project for the acquisition or improvement of which the bonds are issued, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, revenues of a prior existing project which is improved by the expenditure of the bond proceeds, and revenues of improvements theretofore or thereafter acquired to such project which are not acquired by the expenditure of such bond proceeds; and the principal of and interest on special assessment bonds herein authorized to be issued, and any prior redemption premium or premiums, shall be payable solely out of moneys collected on account of the assessments, principal, interest and any penalties, levied for the project for the acquisition or improvement of which the bonds are issued; provided, however, that the payment of such special assessment bonds may at the board’s option be additionally secured as herein provided. The board may ascertain and determine in a resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds that the district has, or will have during the term of the bonds, or has and so will have, designated surplus and unpledged revenues derived from the operation of any income-producing project, or special assessments or excise tax or taxes which the district is herein authorized to levy, fix or charge, or from any combination thereof, and the board in said resolution may pledge all or a portion of such surplus and unpledged revenues as additional security for such payment of said bonds, and at its option may deposit such revenues in a fund created to pay the bonds or created to secure additionally their payment. Any such revenue pledged directly or as additional security for the payment of bonds of any one issue or series which revenues are not exclusively pledged therefor, may subsequently be pledged directly or as additional security for the payment of the bonds of one or more issues or series subsequently authorized. All bonds of the same issue or series shall, subject to the prior and superior rights of outstanding bonds, claims and other obligations, have a prior, paramount and superior lien on the revenues pledged for the payment of the bonds over and ahead of any other claims or obligations thereagainst subsequently incurred; provided, however, the resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds may provide for the subsequent authorization of bonds or other obligations the lien for the payment of which on such revenues is on a parity with the lien thereon of the bonds therein authorized upon such conditions and subject to such limitations as said resolution may provide. All bonds not issued payable solely from such revenues or special assessments (with or without such additional security) shall be the general obligations of the district, and the full faith and credit of the district shall be pledged for the payment thereof. All bonds of the same issue or series shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of maturity, date of bonds, of sale, of execution, or of delivery, by a lien on said revenues in accordance with the provisions of this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] and the resolution authorizing said bonds, except to the extent such resolution shall otherwise specifically provide.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.31.

§ 41-10-132.
Bonds not to be debt of district; exception as to general obligation bonds; bonds to recite that principal and interest payable solely from revenues.

Except for general obligation bonds, bonds issued pursuant to this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] shall not be a debt of the district, and the district shall not be liable thereon, nor shall it thereby pledge its full faith and credit for their payments, nor shall the bonds be payable out of any funds other than the revenues, special assessments, or other moneys pledged to the payment thereof. Each such bond issued under this act shall recite in substance that said bond and the interest thereon are payable solely from the revenues, special assessments or other moneys pledged to the payment thereof. The payment of bonds shall not be secured by an encumbrance, mortgage or other pledge of property of the district, except for revenues, income, tax proceeds and other moneys pledged for the payment of bonds. No property of the district, subject to said exceptions, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.32.